District of Columbia statutes.
49-215

Annual inspections.

An annual inspection and muster of each organization of the National Guard, and an inspection of their armories and of public property in their possession, shall be made at such times and places as the Commanding General may order and direct.

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 778, ch. 328, § 42
renumbered Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 634, ch. 146, § 45
1981 Ed., § 39-215.
1973 Ed., § 39-515.